Arkansas, session 2025, SB533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-15-503(5), concerning the definition of
"industrial hemp" within the Arkansas Industrial Hemp Production Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(5) “Industrial hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa and any part of
the plant, including the seeds of the plant and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a total the lesser of a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration
of no more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of the hemp-derived
cannabadiol on a dry weight basis, unless specifically controlled under the
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-101 et seq. for hemp or as
otherwise defined by 7 U.S.C. § 1639o, as existing on January 1, 2025;
*JMB498*
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-64-101(16)(B), concerning the exclusion
from the definition of "marijuana" within the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(vii) Consumable hemp product as defined under § 20-
56-501 et seq.;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(a)(2), concerning the substances
in Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinols, unless the tetrahydrocannabinol is:
(A) Contained in hemp-derived cannabidiol;
(B) Not more than the lesser of three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol in the hemp-derived
cannabidiol concentration of more than three tenths of one percent (0.3%) on
a dry weight basis for hemp or as otherwise defined by 7 U.S.C. § 1639o, as
existing on January 1, 2025, as verified by a nationally accredited
laboratory for quality, purity, and accuracy standards; and
(C) Not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for marketing as a medication;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(a)(5)(A)(i)(i), concerning the
substances in Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(i) A product derived from industrial hemp
that was produced as a result of a synthetic chemical process that converted
the industrial hemp or a substance contained in the industrial hemp into
delta-8, delta-9, delta-6a,10a, or delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol including
their respective acetate esters and other intoxicating hemp products as
defined in § 20-56-501 et seq.; and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(a)(5)(A)(i), concerning the
substances in Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(k) An intoxicating hemp product as defined
under § 20-56-501 et seq.;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-64-215(d), concerning the substances in
Schedule VI of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) This section does not prohibit the continuous interstate
transportation or shipment through Arkansas of the plant Cannabis sativa L.,
and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether
growing or not, with the lesser of a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry
weight basis, produced in accordance with or as otherwise defined in 7 U.S.C.
§ 1639o et seq., as existing on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(254), concerning the enumerated
special revenues in this state, is amended to read as follows:
(254) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-501 et seq.;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-6-831, effective until the contingency
in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is amended to read as follows:
19-6-831. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-501 et seq. shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq.,
and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-6-831, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
19-6-831. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-401 et seq., shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq.,
and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 5 — Consumable Hemp Products

20-56-501. Legislative intent.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
It is the intent of the General Assembly that this subchapter shall:
(1) Regulate the manufacture, production, distribution, and sale
of consumable hemp products;
(2) Prevent the manufacturing, production, distribution,
marketing, sale, and use of intoxicating hemp products within Arkansas; and
(3) Protect and promote the public health and welfare of the
residents of this state.

20-56-502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Annual” or “annually” means the fiscal year from July 1
through the next June 30;
(2) “Approved laboratory” means a laboratory that is accredited
by the National Institute on Drug Abuse, the National Environmental
Laboratory Accreditation Conference, the International Organization for
Standardization, or similar accrediting entity as determined by Arkansas
Tobacco Control and that has been approved by the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control specifically for the testing of consumable hemp product;
(3)(A) “Cannabis” means all parts of the plant of the genus
cannabis, the flower, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of
the plant and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
preparation of the plant, and its seeds or its resin, including whole plant
extracts.
(B) "Cannabis" does not include cannabis-derived drug
products approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration under
Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as existing on
January 1, 2025;
(4) “Consumable hemp product” means a finished product that
includes part of the hemp plant, including naturally derived cannabinoids,
compounds, concentrates, extracts, isolates, or derivatives that is intended
for human consumption and not marketed for intoxicating effect and is:
(A) A cosmetic as defined by 21 U.S.C. § 321, as existing
on January 1, 2025, that meets the federally defined tetrahydrocannabinol
level;
(B) Any product generally recognized as safe by the United
States Food and Drug Administration under the Federal Food, Drug, and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., and the intended mode of consumption
comports with generally recognized as safe recognition; or
(C) A product that has no more than one milligram (1 mg)
of total tetrahydrocannabinol per container and minimum ratio of cannabidiol
to tetrahydrocannabinol of greater than fifteen to one (15:1) and is:
(i) A full spectrum hemp extract or cannabinoid hemp
product containing multiple hemp-derived cannabinoids, terpenes, and other
naturally occurring compounds, processed without the intentional complete
removal of any compound and without the addition of isolated cannabinoids; or
(ii) A product primarily containing and marketed as
cannabidiol, cannabichromene, cannabinol, cannabigerol, cannabicycol,
cannabidivarin, cannabielsoin, cannabicitran, cannabicycol, cannabielsoin, or
tetrahydrocannabivarin;
(5) “Consumable hemp distributor” means a person that receives
raw hemp, hemp floral material, extracts, distillates, isolates, or any
extracted form of hemp as long as the extracted form of hemp is extracted
from hemp for the manufacturing, distribution, or processing of any
consumable hemp product including without limitation edibles, tinctures,
lubricants, salves, lotions, hemp floral material, concentrates, distillates,
or liquids;
(6)(A) “Consumable hemp manufacturer” means a person that
manufacturers, fabricates, assembles, or processes a hemp-derived product,
including without limitation federally licensed importers and federally
licensed distributors that deal in consumable hemp products.
(B) “Consumable hemp manufacturer” includes:
(i) A sales entity affiliate of the manufacturer or
any other entity representing the manufacturer with regard to the sale of
consumable hemp products produced by the manufacturer or wholesalers or
permitted retailers; and
(ii) A person that mixes, compounds, extracts,
infuses, blends, processes, repackages, or resizes consumable hemp products
including the extraction of cannabinoids from hemp biomass.
(C) “Consumable hemp manufacturer” does not include a
person who engages in the agricultural production of hemp, such as growing,
planting, and harvesting of raw hemp biomass regulated by the State Plant
Board;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(7) “Consumable hemp retailer” means a dealer licensed by the
Arkansas Tobacco Control Board, other than a consumable hemp wholesaler,
whose principal place of business is that of selling merchandise at retail,
including online sales, and who sells consumable hemp products;
(8) “Consumable hemp wholesaler” means a dealer licensed by the
Arkansas Tobacco Control Board whose principal place of business is that of a
wholesaler dealer, and who is known to the trade as such, that sells any
consumable hemp products to licensed consumable hemp retailers only for the
purpose of resale to consumers;
(9) “Consumer” means a member of the public at large;
(10) “Consumption” means any method of ingestion of or
application to the body, including eating, drinking, inhaling, absorbing, or
injecting, through which a product is metabolized or is otherwise subject to
a biotransformative process when introduced into the human body;
(11)(A) “Container” means any final packaged product that is
offered, intended for sale, or sold to a consumer in the form of an external
package, can, bottle, bag, or other receptacle that can hold hemp or
consumable hemp products.
(B) "Container" does not include:
(i) Exit packaging, a shipping container, or an
outer wrapping used solely for the transport of products in bulk quantity; or
(ii) Any package, can, bottle, bag, or other
receptacle that may house the products individually inside the external
container;
(12) “Days” means calendar days unless otherwise specified;
(13) “Delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol” means the sum of the
percentage by weight of tetrahydrocannabinol acid multiplied by eight hundred
seventy-seven thousandths (0.877) plus the percentage by weight of delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol;
(14) “Federally defined tetrahydrocannabinol level” means the
lesser of a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than three
tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis for hemp or as otherwise
defined in 7 U.S.C. § 1639o, as existing on January 1, 2025;
(15) “Finished product” means a product intended for consumer
use to be sold at retail;
(16) “Hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa and any part of the
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
plant, including the seeds of the plant, that contains a delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) or
less on a dry-weight basis, and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not;
(17)(A) “Intoxicating hemp product” means a finished product
intended for human consumption that is derived from or contains hemp or hemp
extract and contains a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that exceeds
zero percent (0%) when tested in its finished form.
(B) "Intoxicating hemp product" may contain derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, esters, ethers, acids, salts, and salts of
isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of such isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation
including without limitation:
(i) Delta-10 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and
its optical isomers;
(ii) Delta-9 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and
its optical isomers;
(iii) Delta-8 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and
its optical isomers;
(iv) Delta-7 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and
its optical isomers;
(v) Delta-6a, 10a cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol
and its optical isomers;
(vi) Exo-tetrahydrocannabinol;
(vii) Metabolites of tetrahydrocannabinol, including
11-hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol, 3-27 hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol, and 7- 12
hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol;
(viii) Tetrahydrocannabinolic acid;
(ix) Hydrogenated forms of tetrahydrocannabinol,
including hexahydrocannabinol, hexaydrocannabiphrol, and
hexahydrocannabihexol;
(x) Synthetic forms of tetrahydrocannabinol,
including dronabinol;
(xi) Ester forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including
delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate, delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate,
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
delta-6a,10a tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate and hexahydrocannabinol-O-6
acetate;
(xii) Ether forms of tetrahydrocannabinol and
hexahydrocannabinol including delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol methyl ether and
delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol methyl ether;
(xiii) Tetrahydrocannabivarins, including delta-8
tetrahydrocannabivarin but excluding delta-9 tetrahydrocannabivarin;
(xiv) Analogues or tetrahydrocannabinols with an
alkyl chain of four (4) or more carbon atoms, including
tetrahydrocannabiphorols, tetrahydrocannabioctyls, tetrahydocannabihexols, or
tetrahydrocannabutols;
(xv) Delta-8 isotetrahydrocannabinol, delta4(8)-
isotetrahydrocannabinol and isohexahydrocannabinol;
(xvi) Any combination of the compounds, including
hexahydrocannabiphorol-o-ester and delta-8 tetrahydrocannabiphorol acetate,
delta-9 tetrahydorcannabiphorol acetate; and
(xvii)(a) Any other cannabinoid classified as an
intoxicant by rule of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board.
(b) The Arkansas Tobacco Control Board shall
notify the Department of Health when and if additional cannabinoids are
classified as an intoxicant by the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board.
(C) "Intoxicating hemp product" does not include a consumable hemp
product or medical marijuana regulated under the Arkansas Medical Marijuana
Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;
(18) “Minor” means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years
of age;
(19) “Person” means an individual, retailer, wholesaler,
manufacturer, firm, association, company, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, joint-stock company, club, agency, syndicate, county,
municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the state, receiver,
trustee, fiduciary, or trade association;
(20) “Principal place of business” means the physical location:
(A) Where orders for consumable hemp products are taken or
received or where consumable hemp products are sold; and
(B) That is on file with the Arkansas Tobacco Control
Board;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(21) “Produce” means to grow industrial hemp for market or for
cultivation for market;
(22)(A) “Sale” or “sell” means a transfer, exchange, or barter
in any manner or by any means for any consideration, including distributing
or shipping consumable hemp products in connection with a sale.
(B) A sale “in” or “into” a state refers to the state in
which the destination point of the consumable hemp product is located in the
sale without regard to where title was transferred.
(C) A sale “from” a state refers to the sale of a
consumable hemp product that is located in that state to the destination in
question without regard to where title was transferred;
(23) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means a compound that is the
natural, primary active cannabinoid substance or its equivalent contained in
the plant of the genus Cannabis or in the resinous extracts of the plant,
including derivatives or isomers derived from such cannabinoids;
(24) "Total tetrahydrocannabinol" means the total concentration
of all tetrahydrocannabinols, including delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid or its decarboxylated equivalent, and any other chemically similar
compound, substance, derivative, or isomer of tetrahydrocannabinol, and any
other cannabinoid identified by the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board; and
(25) “Warehouse” means a place where consumable hemp products
are stored for another person and to or from which place the consumable hemp
products are shipped or delivered upon order by the owner of the consumable
hemp, to the warehouse.

20-56-503. Construction.
(a) A consumable hemp product shall not be delivered, sold, bought, or
used in this state except in conformity with applicable laws and rules,
including this subchapter and rules promulgated under this subchapter.
(b) A person shall not manufacture, process, distribute, or sell a
consumable hemp product without being permitted by the Arkansas Tobacco
Control Board.
(c) A product intended for human consumption or inhalation that is
derived from hemp and contains tetrahydrocannabinol shall not be permitted or
allowed under the laws of this state, other than consumable hemp products if
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
otherwise legal under state law.
(d)(1) A consumable hemp product shall not be combined with or contain
any of the following:
(A) Ethanol;
(B) Nicotine or tobacco;
(C) Intoxicating hemp product; or
(D) Any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol as to create a
danger of misuse, overdose, accidental overconsumption, inaccurate dosage, or
other risk to the public.
(2) A medical device, prescription drug, or drug otherwise
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration is not a
consumable hemp product.
(e) The business of handling, receiving, possessing, storing,
distributing, taking orders for, soliciting orders of, selling, offering for
sale, and dealing in, through sale, barter, or exchange, consumable hemp
products is declared to be a privilege under the laws of this state.

20-56-504. Permits.
(a)(1) Each person listed in this section, before commencing business
or if already in business, before continuing business, shall pay an annual
privilege fee and secure a permit from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(2) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location
may, with the permission of the seller and the Arkansas Tobacco Control
Board, operate under the selling owner’s permit for no more than thirty (30)
days from the date of the sale.
(b)(1) In addition to securing a permit under subsection (a) of this
section, a consumable hemp manufacturer whose products are sold in this state
shall register with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(2) A consumable hemp wholesaler shall secure the proper
wholesale permit.
(3) Every consumable hemp retailer that operates a place of
business shall secure the proper retail permit.
(c)(1) Permits shall be issued as follows:
(A) A permit for a sole proprietorship is issued in the
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
owner’s name and in the fictitious business name, if any;
(B)(i) A permit for a partnership or limited liability
company is issued in the name of:
(a) The managing partner or managing member;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company.
(ii) If the managing partner or managing member of a
limited liability company is a partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, then the permit shall be issued in the name of:
(a) The president or chief executive officer;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company; and
(C) A permit for a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded
corporation shall be issued in the name of the president or chief executive
officer of the corporation and in the name of the corporation.
(2) It is a violation for a permitted entity not to provide
written notification to the director within thirty (30) days of a change in
the following:
(A) The managing partner of a partnership, managing member
of a limited liability company, or president or chief executive officer of a
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company; or
(B) The stockholders effecting twenty-five percent (25%)
or more of the total voting shares of a nonpublicly traded corporation.
(d)(1) When an entity transfers a business permitted under this
subchapter, the entity to which the business is transferred:
(A) Shall apply for a new permit under this subchapter;
(B) May be issued a new permit under this subchapter; and
(C) May operate under the selling entity’s permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the sale.
(2) When a partnership or limited liability company permitted
under this subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the managing partner,
managing member, president, or chief executive officer:
(A) The existing permit issued under this subchapter is
void; and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(B) The partnership or limited liability company:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the managing partner, managing member, president, or chief
executive officer.
(3) When a nonpublicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
nonpublicly traded corporation’s stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The nonpublicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
replacement of the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(4) When a publicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
publicly traded corporation’s stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The publicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
replacement of the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(e) An entity may apply for and be issued a permit under this
subchapter in advance of the effective date of the permit to facilitate
continuity of business operations.

20-56-505. Permits — Location — Background check required.
(a) A consumable hemp retailer permit, consumable hemp wholesaler
permit, or consumable hemp manufacturer permit shall not be issued to a
residential address, a mobile structure, vehicle, or for an address not zoned
appropriately for the business seeking to secure the permit.
(b) A permit shall not be issued to:
(1) A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
been found guilty of a felony; or
(2) A business owned or operated, in whole or in part, by a
person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a
felony.
(c) The Arkansas Tobacco Control Board shall conduct a criminal
background check on each permit applicant and application, using the Arkansas
Crime Information Center.

20-56-506. Permits — Annual privilege fees.
(a) The annual privilege fee for each permit authorized by this
subchapter is established as follows:
(1) Consumable hemp wholesaler permit $5,000
(2) Consumable hemp retailer permit $5,000
(3) Consumable hemp manufacturer permit $5,000
(b)(1) All permits issued under this subchapter shall expire on June
30 following the effective date of issuance.
(2)(A) Upon the failure to timely renew a permit issued under
this subchapter, a late fee of two (2) times the amount of the appropriate
permit fee shall be owed in addition to the annual privilege fee for the
permit.
(B) An expired permit that is not renewed before September
1 following the expiration of the permit shall not be renewed, and the holder
of the expired permit shall submit an application for a new permit.
(3) A permit shall not be issued to the applicant until the late
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
fee and the permit fee have been paid.
(c) A permit issued under this subchapter shall not be renewed for a
permit holder who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a privilege
fee, tax relating to the sale or dispensing of a consumable hemp product, or
any other state and local tax due the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(d) A person who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a state
or local tax may not renew or obtain a permit issued under this subchapter
except upon certification that the permit holder has entered into a repayment
agreement with the Department of Finance and Administration and is current on
the payments.
(e) A permit holder who has unpaid fees, civil penalties, or an
unserved permit suspension may not transfer, sell, or give consumable hemp
product inventory of the business associated with the permit to a third party
until all fees and civil penalties are paid in full and all suspensions are
completed successfully, nor shall any third party be issued a new permit for
the business location.
(f) Each consumable hemp manufacturer, consumable hemp wholesaler, and
consumable hemp retailer shall retain copies of all invoices for the purchase
or sale of any consumable hemp product for a period of at least ten (10)
years subject to examination by the secretary and the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control or their authorized agents upon demand at any time during
regular business hours.
(g) A consumable hemp retailer shall:
(1) Maintain copies of at least the last three hundred sixty-
five (365) days of consumable hemp product invoices, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand;
(2)(A) Make the invoices that are older than three hundred
sixty-five (365) days available upon demand at any time during normal
business hours in the retail store.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(C) of this
section, an agent of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board may determine a
reasonable time frame for which invoices are to be provided under subdivision
(g)(2)(A) of this section.
(C) An invoice that is provided seventy-two (72) hours
more after the demand shall not be considered for purposes of determining
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
violation of this subsection;
(3) Retain invoices for all consumable hemp products in the
retail store even if the invoice for the consumable hemp product is older
than three (3) years;
(4) Maintain a copy of the signed server awareness forms for
each employee of the retailer who engages in the sale of consumable hemp
products, which the retailer shall provide immediately upon demand;
(5)(A) Maintain a copy of any complete transfer forms showing:
(i) The consumable hemp products that were
transferred;
(ii) The permitted location from which the
consumable hemp products were transferred; and
(iii) When the transfer occurred.
(B) A transfer form shall be completed contemporaneously
with the transfer and shall be provided immediately by the retailer upon
demand; and
(6) If any inventory was submitted with a permit application,
maintain a copy of the submitted inventory form, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand.
(h) A consumable hemp wholesaler and consumable hemp manufacturer
shall:
(1) Maintain ten (10) years of consumable hemp product invoices
that are available upon demand during normal business hours in the permitted
location; and
(2) Permit the board and authorized personnel of the board to
enter into and inspect stock of consumable hemp products, and any documents
and records relating to receipts and disbursements of consumable hemp
products.
(i) An invoice from a consumable hemp wholesaler to a consumable hemp
retailer shall contain the name or other identifying information of the
consumable hemp wholesaler and the consumable hemp retailer.
(j)(1) A nonresident consumable hemp wholesaler shall also keep a
record of all consumable hemp products purchased for distribution within this
state.
(2) All books, records, and memoranda pertaining to the purchase
and sale of the consumable hemp products under subdivision (j)(1) of this
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
section shall be subject to inspection by the board.
(k) Authorized personnel of the board shall not release to the board
or to the public any information identifying customers of the consumable hemp
manufacturer, consumable hemp wholesaler, or warehouse except when necessary
to notify the board of alleged violations of this subchapter.

20-56-507. Permits — Not transferable — Duplicates.
(a) A permit under this subchapter is not transferable to a:
(1) Subsequent owner or operator; or
(2) Different physical location unless the permit holder obtains
permission from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(b) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location may
operate under the selling owner’s permit for no more than thirty (30) days
from the date of the sale.
(c) When a permit is lost by a permit holder, a duplicate permit may
be issued upon application and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) when
sufficient proof has been given to the director.

20-56-508. Permits — Suspension or revocation.
(a) All permits issued under this subchapter shall be suspended or
revoked by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for any violation of this
subchapter or the rules pertaining to this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board at the next regularly scheduled
board meeting.
(b) The director may revoke all permits to deal in consumable hemp
products associated with any person who is convicted of or pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to a criminal violation of this subchapter, subject to a
hearing before the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

20-56-509. Advertising prohibitions and packaging requirements.
(a) A consumable hemp product distributed or offered for sale in this
state shall include the following information on the product label or product
packaging:
(1) The name of the consumable hemp product distributor or
consumable hemp product manufacturer, whether in-state or out-of-state;
(2) Product labeling clearly showing that the product contains
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
material derived from hemp and not marijuana or medical marijuana; and
(3) Any other marking, words, statement, or symbol as required
by the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board through rules.
(b) A person shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale in this
state any consumable hemp product by using, in the labeling or design of the
product, its packaging, or in its advertising or marketing materials, trade
dress, trademarks, branding, or other related imagery that:
(1) Imitates or replicates those of food brands or other related
products that are marketed to or are commonly associated with children or
minors, including without limitation breakfast cereal, cookies, juice drinks,
soft drinks, frozen drinks, ice creams, sorbets, sherbets, and frozen pops;
(2) Depicts or signifies characters or symbols that are known to
a reasonable person to appeal primarily to or are commonly associated with
children or minors, including without limitation superheroes, cartoons or
cartoon characters, including anime characters, comic book characters, video
game characters, television show characters, movie characters, mythical
creatures, unicorns, or that otherwise incorporates related imagery or
scenery; or
(3) Uses the terms “candy”, “candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, “pies”,
or “cupcakes” or any variant of these terms, or any other term referencing a
type or brand of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies, including types or brands
of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies that do not include the words “candy”,
“candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, "pastries", “pies”, or “cupcakes” in their names,
labels, or slogans.

20-56-510. Testing.
(a) All consumable hemp sold in this state shall be tested by an
approved laboratory.
(b) An approved laboratory shall be an independent third-party
laboratory.
(c) A consumable hemp product sold in this state shall be tested for
the following and marked as to the consumable hemp product chemical makeup
before being sold to consumers:
(1) Cannabinoid profile;
(2) Solvents;
(3) Pesticides;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(4) Microbials;
(5) Heavy metals; and
(6) Any non-hemp-based substance.
(d) A consumable hemp product shall not be distributed or sold in this
state without a certificate of analysis from an approved laboratory that
confirms:
(1) The consumable hemp product was tested by an approved
laboratory;
(2) A tested representative sample of the consumable hemp
product contained a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that did
not exceed three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) under this subchapter; and
(3) A detailed analysis and list of the chemical makeup of the
tested consumable hemp product under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) The Arkansas Tobacco Control Board may periodically sample,
analyze, and test any consumable hemp product located in this state.
(f) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall:
(1) Investigate and issue subpoenas to any permittee or approved
laboratory used by a permittee that the director has reasonable suspicion of
intentionally producing falsified test results on consumable hemp; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the enforcement of this section and set
penalties for any violation of the rules.

20-56-511. Providing minors with consumable hemp products — Purchase,
use, or possession prohibited.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for any person to give, barter, or sell to a
minor a consumable hemp product.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a
person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of
violating subdivision (a)(1) of this section is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) An employee or owner of a retail location permitted under
this subchapter who violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section while inside
the retail location upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) per violation.
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a minor to:
(A) Use or possess or to purchase or attempt to purchase a
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
consumable hemp product; or
(B) For the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain a
consumable hemp product, falsely represent himself or herself not to be a
minor by displaying proof of age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually
proof of the minor’s age.
(2) Any consumable hemp product found in the possession of a
minor may be confiscated and destroyed by a law enforcement officer.
(c)(1) It is not an offense under subsection (b) of this section if:
(A) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board to enforce or ensure compliance
with laws relating to the prohibition of the sale of consumable hemp product
to minors;
(B) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services to compile statistical data relating to the sale
of consumable hemp products to minors;
(C) The minor was acting at the request of a permit holder
to assist the permit holder by performing a check on the permit holder’s own
retail business to see if the permit holder’s employees would sell consumable
hemp products to the minor; or
(D) The minor was acting as an agent of a retail permit
holder within the scope of employment.
(2) A minor performing activities under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Display the appearance of a minor;
(B) Have the written consent of the minor’s parent or
guardian to perform the activity on file with the agency utilizing the minor;
and
(C)(i) Present a true and correct identification if asked.
(ii) Any failure on the part of a minor to provide
true and correct identification upon request is a defense to any action under
this section or a civil action under § 26-57-256.
(d) Any person who sells consumable hemp products has the right to
deny the sale of any consumable hemp product to any person.
(e) It is unlawful for any person who has been issued a permit or a
license under this subchapter to fail to display in a conspicuous place a
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
sign indicating that the sale of consumable hemp products to or purchase or
possession of consumable hemp products by a minor is prohibited by law.
(f) It is unlawful for any manufacturer whose consumable hemp product
is distributed in this state and any person who has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to distribute a free sample of any consumable
hemp product or any component of a consumable hemp product or coupon that
entitles the holder of the coupon to any free sample of any consumable hemp
product or any component of a consumable hemp product:
(1) In or on any public street or sidewalk within five hundred
feet (500’) of any playground, public school, or other facility when the
playground, public school, or other facility is being used primarily by
minors for recreational, educational, or other purposes; or
(2) To any minor.
(g) It is unlawful for any person that has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to:
(1) Sell or distribute a consumable hemp product through a self-
service display, a vending machine, or an order executed solely over the
internet or similar means; or
(2) Advertise or promote consumable hemp in a manner that is
intended to appeal to minors.
(h) Any retail permit holder or license holder who violates any
provision in this section is deemed guilty of a violation and subject to
penalties under § 26-57-256.
(i)(1) A notice of an alleged violation of this section shall be given
to the holder of a retail permit or license or an agent of the holder within
ten (10) days of the alleged violation.
(2) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Contain the date and time of the alleged violation;
and
(B)(i) Include either the name of the person making the
alleged sale or information reasonably necessary to determine the location in
the store that allegedly made the sale.
(ii) When appropriate, information under subdivision
(i)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall include without limitation:
(a) The cash register number of the sale in
the store;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(b) The physical location of the sale in the
store; and
(c) If possible, the lane or aisle number of
the sale in the store.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (h) of this section,
the court shall consider the following factors when reviewing a possible
violation:
(1) The business has adopted and enforced a written policy
against selling consumable hemp products to minors;
(2) The business has informed its employees of the applicable
laws regarding the sale of consumable hemp product to minors;
(3) The business has required employees to verify the age of a
customer attempting to purchase a consumable hemp product by way of
photographic identification;
(4) The business has established and imposed disciplinary
sanctions for noncompliance; and
(5) The appearance of the purchaser of the consumable hemp
product was such that an ordinary prudent person would believe him or her to
be of legal age to make the purchase.
(k) A person convicted of violating any provision of this section
whose permit or license to distribute or sell a consumable hemp product is
suspended or revoked upon conviction shall surrender to the court any permit
or license to distribute or sell a consumable hemp product, and the court
shall transmit the permit or license to distribute or sell a consumable hemp
product to the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control:
(1) To suspend or revoke the person’s permit or license to
distribute or sell a consumable hemp product and to not renew the permit or
license; and
(2) Not to issue any new permit or license to that person for
the period of time determined by the court in accordance with this section.

20-56-512. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) It is the duty of all state, county, and city officials to assist
the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board in enforcing this subchapter.
(b) A person within the jurisdiction of this state who is not
permitted to sell consumable hemp products to retailers or consumers and who
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
sells, takes orders from, delivers, or causes to be delivered immediately or
in the future any consumable hemp to retailers or consumers in this state
upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person engaged in buying or selling consumable hemp products in
this state without first obtaining the proper permit upon conviction is
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) This subchapter does not prohibit the interstate transportation or
shipment through this state of the plant Cannabis sativa L., and any part of
that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis, from one licensed
hemp producer in another state to a licensed hemp handler in another state.

20-56-513. Prohibitions.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to:
(1) Violate this subchapter or any rules promulgated under this
subchapter;
(2) Manufacture, produce, or market any product derived from
cannabis for sale within this state, except as authorized under this
subchapter and the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98;
(3) Sell or distribute any product derived from cannabis within
this state or to consumers of this state, except as authorized under this
subchapter and the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98;
(4) Manufacture, distribute, sell, or market a consumable hemp
product that is not reported to the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board as
required by this subchapter;
(5) Manufacture, produce, market, or sell any intoxicating hemp
product;
(6) Sell any consumable hemp product to a minor; or
(7) Market or promote a consumable hemp product or other hemp
product:
(A) For an intoxicating effect;
(B) As containing tetrahydrocannabinol; or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(C) With unlawful drug or health claims.
(b) Any person that purposely, knowingly, or recklessly violates this
subchapter relating to hemp production, manufacture, sale, distribution,
marketing, or processing shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
conviction of the violation, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail
for not more than one (1) year, or both.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, any person that
purposefully, recklessly, or knowingly manufactures, markets, or sells an
intoxicating hemp product shall be guilty of a felony.
(d) Any violation of this subchapter is a deceptive and unconscionable
trade practice under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
and all remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney General
under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq., shall be
available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this subchapter.
(e) The prosecuting attorney in the county where the alleged crime was
committed shall also have full authority to enforce this subchapter.
(f) This subchapter does not prohibit the bringing of a civil action
against a violator of this subchapter by an individual harmed by the
violator’s acts or omissions.

20-56-514. Consumable hemp product directory.
(a) By December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, every licensed
consumable hemp manufacturer of a consumable hemp product that is sold for
retail sale in this state, whether the consumable hemp product manufacturer
is located in or outside this state, shall execute and deliver to the
Arkansas Tobacco Control Board a certification, under penalty of perjury, on
a form and in a manner prescribed by the board, that the manufacturer is
compliant with this subchapter.
(b) The certification form shall separately list each brand name,
category, product name, and flavor for each consumable hemp product that is
sold in this state.
(c)(1) On and after December 1, 2025, the board shall maintain and
make publicly available on its official website a directory that lists all
consumable hemp product manufacturers, brand names, categories, product
names, and flavors for which certification forms have been submitted and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
approved by the board and shall update the directory at least monthly to
ensure accuracy.
(2) The board shall establish a process to provide licensed
consumable hemp retailers, consumable hemp distributors, and consumable hemp
wholesalers notice of the initial publication of the directory and changes
made to the directory in the prior month.
(d) After ninety (90) calendar days following publication of the
directory, consumable hemp products not listed in the directory and intended
for retail sale in this state are subject to seizure, forfeiture, and
destruction, and shall not be purchased or sold for retail sale in this
state.
(e) Any person who sells or offers for sale a consumable hemp product
for retail sale in this state that is not included in the directory shall be
subject to a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each
individual consumable hemp product offered for sale in violation of this
section until the offending consumable hemp product is removed from the
market or until the offending consumable hemp product is properly listed on
the directory.
(f) The civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited
into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the Arkansas
Tobacco Control Revenue Fund.

20-56-515. Notice required at point of sale — Penalties.
(a) A person shall not sell or offer for sale a consumable hemp
product in this state unless a clearly visible notice is posted at the
location where the consumable hemp product is available for purchase.
(b) The notice described under subsection (a) of this section shall
state that:
(1) A consumable hemp product contains tetrahydrocannabinol;
(2) Women who are pregnant or breastfeeding should not use
products that contain tetrahydrocannabinol due to the risk of birth defects
and other developmental defects; and
(3) A minor shall not purchase a consumable hemp product.
(c)(1) In addition to the penalties under this subchapter and the
Arkansas Industrial Hemp Production Act, § 2-15-501 et seq., any person who
sells or offers for sale a consumable hemp product without a notice as
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
described in this section shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars
($500) for the first offense and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for each subsequent offense.
(2) Each violation, and every day in which a violation occurs,
constitutes a separate violation.
(d) Fines collected under this section shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the Arkansas Tobacco
Control Revenue Fund.

20-56-516. Rules.
The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may promulgate rules for the
proper enforcement of his or her powers and duties under this subchapter,
including without limitation the regulation of processing, transportation,
delivery, sale, and purchase of consumable hemp products in accordance with
this subchapter and the power to levy penalties for violations of this
subchapter.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 4, as
amended by Acts 2025, No. 176, § 2, effective if the contingency in Acts
2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
Subchapter 4 — Hemp-Derived Products

20-56-401. Purpose.
It is the intent of this subchapter to provide regulation of certain
hemp-derived products to:
(1) Prevent the sale and use of illicit hemp-based products
within Arkansas; and
(2) Protect and promote the public health and welfare of the
residents of this state.

20-56-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Annual” or “annually” means the fiscal year from July 1
through the next June 30;
(2) “Approved laboratory” means a laboratory that is accredited
by the National Institute on Drug Abuse, the National Environmental
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
Laboratory Accreditation Conference, the International Organization for
Standardization, or a similar accrediting entity as determined by Arkansas
Tobacco Control and that has been approved by the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control specifically for the testing of hemp-derived product;
(3) “Consumer” means a member of the public at large;
(4) “Days” means calendar days unless otherwise specified;
(5) “Finished product” means a product intended for consumer use
to be sold at retail;
(6) “Hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa and any part of the
plant, including the seeds of the plant, that contains a delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) or
less on a dry-weight basis, and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not;
(7) “Hemp-derived e-liquid product” means a liquid hemp-derived
product that contains hemp that is inhaled when using a vapor product, and
that may or may not include without limitation propylene glycol, vegetable
glycerin, and flavorings;
(8)(A) “Hemp-derived product” means a product intended for any
form of human consumption, including consumption by vapor inhalation, or a
component of a product, that is derived from hemp, including all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, and any
product made from such derivatives, and that contains greater than three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%) tetrahydrocannabinol.
(B) “Hemp-derived product” includes a hemp-derived e-
liquid product and a vapor product.
(C) “Hemp-derived product” does not include:
(i) A product intended for animal consumption or
use;
(ii) A cosmetic as defined by § 20-56-202;
(iii) Any marijuana, medical marijuana, or other
cannabis product containing delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol greater than three-
tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis as administered, licensed,
and otherwise regulated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the
Medical Marijuana Commission, and the Department of Health under the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;
(iv) A raw hemp product, including any intact plant,
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
flower, buds, leaves, or stems;
(v) A drug in the form for which an application
filed in accordance with 21 U.S.C. § 355 is approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration;
(vi) A dietary supplement as defined by the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.; or
(vii) A fabric, textile, cordage, fiber, fuel, paper,
construction material, plastic, seed, seed meal, and seed oil;
(9)(A) “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures,
fabricates, assembles, or processes a hemp-derived product, including without
limitation federally licensed importers and federally licensed distributors
that deal in hemp-derived products.
(B) “Manufacturer” includes:
(i) A sales entity affiliate of the manufacturer or
any other entity representing the manufacturer with regard to the sale of
hemp-derived products produced by the manufacturer to wholesalers or
permitted retailers; and
(ii) A person that mixes, compounds, extracts,
infuses, blends, processes, repackages, or resizes hemp-derived products
including the extraction of cannabinoids from hemp biomass.
(C) “Manufacturer” does not include a person who engages
in the agricultural production of hemp, such as growing, planting, and
harvesting of raw hemp biomass regulated by the State Plant Board;
(10) “Minor” means a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of
age;
(11) “Person” means an individual, retailer, wholesaler,
manufacturer, firm, association, company, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, joint-stock company, club, agency, syndicate, the State
of Arkansas, county, municipal corporation or other political subdivision of
the state, receiver, trustee, fiduciary, or trade association;
(12) “Place of business” means the physical location:
(A) Where orders for hemp-derived products are taken or
received or where hemp-derived products are sold; and
(B) That is on file with Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(13) “Retailer” means a person that purchases hemp-derived
products from permitted wholesalers for the purpose of selling the hemp-
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
derived products in person and over the counter at retail to consumers;
(14)(A) “Sale” or “sell” means a transfer, exchange, or
barter in any manner or by any means for any consideration, including
distributing or shipping hemp-derived product in connection with a sale.
(B) A sale “in” or “into” a state refers to the state in
which the destination point of the hemp-derived product is located in the
sale without regard to where title was transferred.
(C) A sale “from” a state refers to the sale of a hemp-
derived product that is located in that state to the destination in question
without regard to where title was transferred;
(15) “Self-service display” means a display:
(A) That contains a hemp-derived product, or any component
of a hemp-derived product;
(B) That is located in an area where customers are
permitted; and
(C) In which the hemp-derived product, or any component of
a hemp-derived product, is readily accessible to a customer without the
assistance of a salesperson;
(16) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means a compound that is the natural,
primary active cannabinoid substance or its equivalent contained in the plant
of the genus cannabis or in the resinous extracts of the plant, including
derivatives or isomers derived from such cannabinoids;
(17) “Vapor product” means hemp-derived product that is an
electronic oral device of any size or shape that contains a vapor of hemp or
hemp-derived e-liquid product that when used or inhaled simulates smoking,
regardless of whether a visible vapor is produced, including without
limitation a device that:
(A) Is composed of a heating element, battery, electronic
circuit, chemical process, mechanical device, or a combination of heating
element, battery, electronic circuit, chemical process, or mechanical device;
(B) Works in combination with a cartridge, other
container, or liquid delivery device containing hemp or hemp-derived e-liquid
product and manufactured for use with vapor products;
(C) Is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as any
type or derivation of a vapor product, e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, or any
other produced name or descriptor; and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(D) Does not include a product regulated as a drug or
device by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.,
as it existed on January 1, 2015;
(18) “Warehouse” means a place where hemp-derived products are
stored for another person and to or from which place the hemp-derived
products are shipped or delivered upon order by the owner of the hemp-derived
products, to the warehouse; and
(19) “Wholesaler” means a person other than a manufacturer or a
person owned or operated by a manufacturer that:
(A) Does business within the state;
(B) Purchases hemp-derived products from any source;
(C) Distributes or sells the hemp-derived products to
other wholesalers, or retailers; and
(D) Does not distribute or sell the hemp-derived products
at retail to consumers.

20-56-403. Construction.
(a) A hemp-derived product shall not be delivered, sold, bought, or
used in this state except in conformity with all applicable laws and
regulations, including this subchapter and any rules promulgated under this
subchapter.
(b) A person shall not sell a hemp-derived product without being
permitted by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(c) A product intended for human consumption or inhalation that is
derived from hemp and contains tetrahydrocannabinol shall not be permitted or
allowed under the laws of this state, other than hemp-derived products if
otherwise legal under state law.
(d)(1) A hemp-derived product shall not be combined with or contain
any of the following:
(A) Any liquid, hydrocolloid, animal-based substance,
thickener, sweetener, flavoring, synthetic product, propylene glycol,
vegetable glycerin, or other non-hemp-derived substance;
(B) Nicotine or tobacco; or
(C) Any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol as to create a
danger of misuse, overdose, accidental overconsumption, inaccurate dosage, or
other risk to the public.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(2) Medical devices, prescription drugs, or drugs otherwise
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration shall not be
considered hemp-derived products.
(e) The business of handling, receiving, possessing, storing,
distributing, taking orders for, soliciting orders of, selling, offering for
sale, and dealing in, through sale, barter, or exchange, hemp-derived
products is declared to be a privilege under the Arkansas Constitution and
laws of the State of Arkansas.

20-56-404. Permits.
(a)(1) Each person listed in this section, before commencing business,
or if already in business, before continuing business, shall pay an annual
privilege fee and secure a permit from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(2) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location
may, with the permission of the seller and Arkansas Tobacco Control, operate
under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days from the
date of the sale.
(b)(1) In addition to securing a permit under subsection (a) of this
section, a manufacturer whose products are sold in this state shall register
with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) A wholesaler of hemp-derived products shall secure the
proper wholesale permit.
(3) Every retailer of hemp-derived products that operates a
place of business shall secure the proper retail permit.
(c)(1) Permits shall be issued as follows:
(A) A permit for a sole proprietorship is issued in the
owner's name and in the fictitious business name, if any;
(B)(i) A permit for a partnership or limited liability
company is issued in the name of:
(a) The managing partner or managing member;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company.
(ii) If the managing partner or managing member of a
limited liability company is a partnership, limited liability company, or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
corporation, then the permit shall be issued in the name of:
(a) The president or chief executive officer;
and
(b) The partnership or limited liability
company; and
(C) A permit for a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded
corporation is issued in the name of the president or chief executive officer
of the corporation and in the name of the corporation.
(2) It is a violation for a permitted entity not to provide
written notification to the director within thirty (30) days of a change in
the following:
(A) The managing partner, limited liability company
managing member, or president or chief executive officer of a corporation,
partnership, or limited liability company; or
(B) The stockholders effecting twenty-five percent (25%)
or more of the total voting shares of a nonpublicly traded corporation.
(d)(1) When an entity transfers a business permitted under this
subchapter, the entity to which the business is transferred:
(A) Shall apply for a new permit under this subchapter;
(B) May be issued a new permit under this subchapter; and
(C) May operate under the selling entity's permit for no
more than thirty (30) days from the date of the sale.
(2) When a partnership or limited liability company permitted
under this subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the managing partner,
managing member, president, or chief executive officer:
(A) The existing permit issued under this subchapter is
void; and
(B) The partnership or limited liability company:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the managing partner, managing member, president, or chief executive officer.
(3) When a nonpublicly traded corporation permitted under this
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
nonpublicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The nonpublicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(4) When a publicly traded corporation permitted under this
subchapter changes, removes, or replaces the president or chief executive
officer named on the permit or changes, removes, or replaces a stockholder
who owns fifty percent (50%) or more of the total voting shares of the
publicly traded corporation's stock:
(A) The permit issued under this subchapter is void; and
(B) The publicly traded corporation:
(i) Shall apply for a new permit under this
subchapter;
(ii) May be issued a new permit under this
subchapter; and
(iii) May operate under the voided permit for no more
than thirty (30) days from the date of the change, removal, or replacement of
the president, chief executive officer, or stockholder.
(e) An entity may apply for and be issued a permit under this
subchapter in advance of the effective date of the permit to facilitate
continuity of business operations.

20-56-405. Permits — Location — Background check required.
(a) A retail, wholesale, or manufacturer permit shall not be issued to
a residential address, a mobile structure or vehicle, or for an address not
zoned appropriately for the business seeking to secure the permit.
(b) A permit shall not be issued to:
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(1) A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
been found guilty of a felony; or
(2) A business owned or operated, in whole or in part, by a
person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a
felony.
(c) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall conduct a criminal background check
on each permit applicant and application, utilizing its Arkansas Crime
Information Center access as a law enforcement agency, in accordance with §§
12-12-1008 — 12-12-1011.

20-56-406. Permits — Annual privilege fees.
(a) The annual privilege fee for each permit authorized by this
subchapter is established as follows:
(1) Wholesale Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(2) Retail Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(3) Manufacturer Hemp-derived Products Permit.............$5,000
(b)(1) All permits issued under this subchapter shall expire on June
30 following the effective date of issuance.
(2)(A) Upon the failure to timely renew a permit issued under
this subchapter, a late fee of two (2) times the amount of the appropriate
permit fee shall be owed in addition to the annual privilege fee for the
permit.
(B) An expired permit that is not renewed before September
1 following the expiration of the permit shall not be renewed, and the holder
of the expired permit shall submit an application for a new permit.
(3) A permit shall not be issued to the applicant until the late
fee and the permit fee have been paid.
(c) A permit issued under this subchapter shall not be renewed for a
permit holder who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a privilege
fee, tax relating to the sale or dispensing of hemp-derived products, or any
other state and local tax due to the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(d) A person who is delinquent more than ninety (90) days on a state
or local tax may not renew or obtain a permit issued under this subchapter
except upon certification that the permit holder has entered into a repayment
agreement with the Department of Finance and Administration and is current on
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
the payments.
(e) A permit holder who has unpaid fees, civil penalties, or an
unserved permit suspension may not transfer, sell, or give hemp-derived
product inventory of the business associated with the permit to a third party
until all fees and civil penalties are paid in full and all suspensions are
completed successfully, nor shall any third party be issued a new permit for
the business location.
(f) Each manufacturer, wholesaler, and retailer shall retain copies of
all invoices for the purchase or sale of any hemp-derived products for a
period of at least ten (10) years subject to examination by the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration and the Director of Arkansas
Tobacco Control or their authorized agents upon demand at any time during
regular business hours.
(g) A retailer shall:
(1) Maintain copies of at least the last three hundred sixty-
five (365) days of hemp-derived product invoices, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand;
(2)(A) Make the invoices that are older than three hundred
sixty-five (365) days available upon demand at any time during normal
business hours in the retail store.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(C) of this
section, an agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control may determine a reasonable time
frame for which invoices are to be provided under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of
this section.
(C) An invoice that is provided seventy-two (72) hours or
more after the demand shall not be considered for purposes of determining a
violation of this subsection;
(3) Retain invoices for all hemp-derived products in the retail
store even if the invoice for the hemp-derived products is older than three
(3) years;
(4) Maintain a copy of the signed server awareness forms for
each employee of the retailer who engages in the sale of hemp-derived
products, which the retailer shall provide immediately upon demand;
(5)(A) Maintain a copy of any complete transfer forms showing:
(i) The hemp-derived products that were transferred;
(ii) The permitted location from which the hemp-
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
derived products were transferred; and
(iii) When the transfer occurred.
(B) A transfer form shall be completed contemporaneously
with the transfer and shall be provided immediately by the retailer upon
demand; and
(6) If any inventory was submitted with a permit application,
maintain a copy of the submitted inventory form, which the retailer shall
provide immediately upon demand.
(h) A wholesaler and manufacturer shall:
(1) Maintain ten (10) years of hemp-derived product invoices
that are available upon demand during normal business hours in the permitted
location; and
(2) Permit Arkansas Tobacco Control and authorized personnel of
Arkansas Tobacco Control to enter into and inspect stock of hemp-derived
products, and any documents and records relating to receipts and
disbursements of hemp-derived products.
(i) An invoice from a wholesaler to a retailer shall contain the name
or other identifying information of the wholesaler and the retailer.
(j)(1) A nonresident wholesaler shall also keep a record of all hemp-
derived products purchased for distribution within this state.
(2) All books, records, and memoranda pertaining to the purchase
and sale of the hemp-derived products under subdivision (j)(1) of this
section shall be subject to inspection by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(k) Authorized personnel of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall not release
to the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board or to the public any information
identifying customers of the manufacturer, wholesaler, or warehouse except
when necessary to notify the board of alleged violations of this subchapter.

20-56-407. Permits — Not transferable — Duplicates.
(a) A permit under this subchapter is not:
(1) Transferable to a subsequent owner or operator; or
(2) Transferable to a different physical location unless the
permit holder obtains permission from the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control.
(b) A person purchasing an existing permitted retail location may
operate under the selling owner's permit for no more than thirty (30) days
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
from the date of the sale.
(c) When a permit is lost by a permit holder, a duplicate permit may
be issued upon application and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) when
sufficient proof has been given to the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control.

20-56-408. Permits — Suspension or revocation.
(a) All permits issued under this subchapter shall be suspended or
revoked by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for any violation of this
subchapter or the rules pertaining to this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board at the next regularly scheduled
board meeting.
(b) The director may revoke all permits to deal in hemp-derived
products associated with any person who is convicted of or pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to criminally violating this subchapter, subject to a hearing
before the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

20-56-409. Advertising prohibitions and packaging requirements.
(a) A hemp-derived product distributed or offered for sale in this
state shall include the following information on the product label or product
packaging:
(1) The name of the hemp-derived product manufacturer, whether
in-state or out-of-state, and distributor, whether in-state or out-of-state;
(2) Product labeling clearly showing that the product contains
material derived from hemp and not marijuana or medical marijuana; and
(3) Any other marking, words, statement, or symbol as required
by Arkansas Tobacco Control through rules.
(b) A person shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale in this
state any hemp-derived product by using, in the labeling or design of the
product, its packaging, or in its advertising or marketing materials, trade
dress, trademarks, branding, or other related imagery that:
(1) Imitates or replicates those of food brands or other related
products that are marketed to or are commonly associated with children or
minors, including without limitation breakfast cereal, cookies, juice drinks,
soft drinks, frozen drinks, ice creams, sorbets, sherbets, and frozen pops;
(2) Depicts or signifies characters or symbols that are known to
a reasonable person to appeal primarily to or are commonly associated with
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
children or minors, including without limitation superheroes, cartoons or
cartoon characters, including anime characters, comic book characters, video
game characters, television show characters, movie characters, mythical
creatures, unicorns, or that otherwise incorporates related imagery or
scenery; or
(3) Uses the terms “candy”, “candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, “pies”,
or “cupcakes” or any variant of these terms, or any other term referencing a
type or brand of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies, including types or brands
of candy, cakes, pastries, or pies that do not include the words “candy”,
“candies”, “cake”, “cakes”, “pies”, or “cupcakes” in their names, labels, or
slogans.

20-56-410. Testing.
(a) All hemp-derived products sold in this state shall be tested by an
approved laboratory.
(b) An approved laboratory shall be an independent third-party
laboratory.
(c) A hemp-derived product sold in this state shall be tested for the
following and marked as to the hemp-derived product chemical makeup before
being sold to consumers:
(1) Cannabinoid profile;
(2) Solvents;
(3) Pesticides;
(4) Microbials;
(5) Heavy metals; and
(6) Any non-hemp-based substance.
(d) A hemp-derived product shall not be distributed or sold in this
state without a certificate of analysis from an approved laboratory that
confirms:
(1) The hemp-derived product was tested by an approved
laboratory;
(2) A tested representative sample of the hemp-derived product
contained a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that did not
exceed three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) under this subchapter; and
(3) A detailed analysis and list of chemical makeup of the
tested hemp-derived product under subsection (c) of this section.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(e) Arkansas Tobacco Control may periodically sample, analyze, and
test any hemp-derived product located in this state.
(f) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control shall:
(1) Investigate and issue subpoenas to any permittee or approved
laboratory used by a permittee that the director has reasonable suspicion of
intentionally producing falsified test results on hemp-derived products; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the enforcement of this section and set
penalties for any violation of the rules.

20-56-411. Providing minors with hemp-derived products — Purchase,
use, or possession prohibited.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for any person to give, barter, or sell to a
minor a hemp-derived product.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a
person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of
violating subdivision (a)(1) of this section is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) An employee or owner of a retail location permitted under
this subchapter who violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section while inside
the retail location upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) per violation.
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a minor to:
(A) Use or possess or to purchase or attempt to purchase a
hemp-derived product; or
(B) For the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain a
hemp-derived product, falsely represent himself or herself not to be a minor
by displaying proof of age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually proof
of the minor's age.
(2) Any hemp-derived product found in the possession of a minor
may be confiscated and destroyed by a law enforcement officer.
(c)(1) It is not an offense under subsection (b) of this section if:
(A) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of Arkansas Tobacco Control to enforce or ensure compliance with laws
relating to the prohibition of the sale of hemp-derived product to minors;
(B) The minor was acting at the direction of an authorized
agent of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
Department of Human Services to compile statistical data relating to the sale
of hemp-derived products to minors;
(C) The minor was acting at the request of a permit holder
to assist the permit holder by performing a check on the permit holder's own
retail business to see if the permit holder's employees would sell hemp-
derived products to the minor; or
(D) The minor was acting as an agent of a retail permit
holder within the scope of employment.
(2) A minor performing activities under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Display the appearance of a minor;
(B) Have the written consent of the minor's parent or
guardian to perform the activity on file with the agency utilizing the minor;
and
(C)(i) Present a true and correct identification if asked.
(ii) Any failure on the part of a minor to provide
true and correct identification upon request is a defense to any action under
this section or a civil action under § 26-57-256.
(d) Any person who sells hemp-derived products has the right to deny
the sale of any hemp-derived product to any person.
(e) It is unlawful for any person who has been issued a permit or a
license under this subchapter to fail to display in a conspicuous place a
sign indicating that the sale of hemp-derived products to or purchase or
possession of hemp-derived products by a minor is prohibited by law.
(f) It is unlawful for any manufacturer whose hemp-derived product is
distributed in this state and any person who has been issued a permit or
license under this subchapter to distribute a free sample of any hemp-derived
product, or any component of a hemp-derived product or coupon that entitles
the holder of the coupon to any free sample of any hemp-derived product, or
any component of a hemp-derived product:
(1) In or on any public street or sidewalk within five hundred
feet (500′) of any playground, public school, or other facility when the
playground, public school, or other facility is being used primarily by
minors for recreational, educational, or other purposes; or
(2) To any minor.
(g) It is unlawful for any person that has been issued a permit or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
license under this subchapter to:
(1) Sell or distribute a hemp-derived product through a self-
service display, a vending machine, or an order executed solely over the
internet or similar means; or
(2) Advertise or promote hemp-derived products in a manner that
is intended to appeal to children.
(h) Any retail permit holder or license holder who violates any
provision in this section is deemed guilty of a violation and subject to
penalties under § 26-57-256.
(i)(1) A notice of an alleged violation of this section shall be given
to the holder of a retail permit or license or an agent of the holder within
ten (10) days of the alleged violation.
(2)(A) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall
contain the date and time of the alleged violation.
(B)(i) The notice under subdivision (i)(1) of this section
shall also include either the name of the person making the alleged sale or
information reasonably necessary to determine the location in the store that
allegedly made the sale.
(ii) When appropriate, information under subdivision
(i)(2)(B)(i) of this section should include, but not be limited to, the:
(a) Cash register number of the sale in the
store;
(b) Physical location of the sale in the
store; and
(c) If possible, the lane or aisle number of
the sale in the store.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (h) of this section,
the court shall consider the following factors when reviewing a possible
violation:
(1) The business has adopted and enforced a written policy
against selling hemp-derived products to minors;
(2) The business has informed its employees of the applicable
laws regarding the sale of hemp-derived products to minors;
(3) The business has required employees to verify the age of a
customer attempting to purchase a hemp-derived product by way of photographic
identification;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(4) The business has established and imposed disciplinary
sanctions for noncompliance; and
(5) That the appearance of the purchaser of the hemp-derived
product was such that an ordinary prudent person would believe him or her to
be of legal age to make the purchase.
(k) A person convicted of violating any provision of this section
whose permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product is
suspended or revoked upon conviction shall surrender to the court any permit
or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product, and the court shall
transmit the permit or license to distribute or sell a hemp-derived product
to the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control:
(1) To suspend or revoke the person's permit or license to
distribute or sell a hemp-derived product and to not renew the permit or
license; and
(2) Not to issue any new permit or license to that person for
the period of time determined by the court in accordance with this section.

20-56-412. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) It is the duty of all state, county, and city officers to assist
Arkansas Tobacco Control in enforcing this subchapter.
(b) A person within the jurisdiction of this state who is not
permitted to sell hemp-derived products to retailers or consumers and who
sells, takes orders from, delivers, or causes to be delivered immediately or
in the future any hemp-derived products to retailers or consumers in the
State of Arkansas is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) A person engaged in buying or selling hemp-derived products in
this state without first obtaining the proper permit upon conviction is
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) This subchapter does not prohibit in any form the continuous
transportation through Arkansas of the plant Cannabis sativa L., and any part
of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis, from one licensed
hemp producer in another state to a licensed hemp handler in another state.

04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
20-56-413. Rules.
The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control and Arkansas Tobacco Control
may promulgate rules for the proper enforcement of their powers and duties
under this subchapter, including without limitation the regulation of
processing, transportation, delivery, sale, and purchase of hemp-derived
products in accordance with this subchapter and the power to levy penalties
for violations of this subchapter.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-57-247(b), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning those unstamped
and untaxed items that may be seized by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco
Control, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may seize and hold for
disposition of the courts or the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board all tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products, consumable hemp products, or intoxicating hemp products found in
the possession of a person dealing in, or a consumer of, tobacco products,
vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products,
consumable hemp products, or intoxicating hemp products if:
(1) Prima facie evidence exists that the full amount of excise
tax due on the tobacco products has not been paid to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration;
(2) Tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products are in the possession of a wholesaler who does
not possess a current Arkansas wholesale permit;
(3) A retail establishment does not possess a current Arkansas
retail permit;
(4) The tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products have been offered for sale to the public at
another location without a current Arkansas retail permit.; or
(5) Consumable hemp products or intoxicating hemp products are
possessed, sold, or offered for sale in violation of § 20-56-501 et seq.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 26-57-247, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
26-57-247. Seizure, forfeiture, and disposition of tobacco products
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
and other property.
(a) Cigarettes to which stamps have not been affixed as provided by
law are subject to seizure and shall be held as evidence for prosecution.
(b) The Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may seize and hold for
disposition of the courts or the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board all tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products,
or hemp-derived products found in the possession of a person dealing in, or a
consumer of, tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products if:
(1) Prima facie evidence exists that the full amount of excise
tax due on the tobacco products has not been paid to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration;
(2) Tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products are in the possession of a wholesaler who does
not possess a current Arkansas wholesale permit;
(3) A retail establishment does not possess a current Arkansas
retail permit;
(4) The tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products have been offered for sale to the public at
another location without a current Arkansas retail permit; or
(5) Hemp-derived products are possessed, sold, or offered for
sale in violation of § 20-56-401 et seq.
(c) Property, including money, used to facilitate a violation of this
subchapter or the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., may be
seized and forfeited to the state.
(d)(1) A prosecuting attorney may institute a civil action against a
person who is convicted of a criminal violation under this subchapter or the
Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., to obtain a judgment for:
(A) Damages in an amount equal to the value of the
property, funds, or a monetary instrument involved in the violation;
(B) The proceeds acquired by a person involved in the
enterprise or by reason of conduct in furtherance of the violation; and
(C) Costs incurred by Arkansas Tobacco Control in the
investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of criminal, civil, and
administrative proceedings.
(2) The standard of proof in an action brought under subdivision
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(d)(1) of this section is preponderance of the evidence.
(e) The following are subject to forfeiture under this section upon
order by a circuit court:
(1) Tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, or e-liquid products distributed, dispensed, or acquired in
violation of this subchapter;
(2) Raw materials, products, or equipment used or intended for
use in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or
exporting a tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product in violation of this subchapter;
(3) Property that is used or intended for use as a container for
property described in subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of this
section;
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(4)(B) of this
section, a conveyance, including an aircraft, vehicle, or vessel, that is
used or intended to be used to transport or in any manner to facilitate the
transportation for the purpose of sale or receipt of property described in
subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of this section.
(B)(i) A conveyance used by a person as a common carrier
in the transaction of business as a common carrier is not subject to
forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other
person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a
violation of this subchapter.
(ii) A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture under
this section by reason of an act or omission established by the owner of the
conveyance to have been committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or
consent.
(C) Upon a showing described in subdivision (e)(4)(B)(i)
of this section by the owner or interest holder of a conveyance, the
conveyance may nevertheless be forfeited if the prosecuting attorney
establishes that the owner or interest holder either knew or should
reasonably have known that the conveyance would be used to transport or in
any manner to facilitate the transportation for the purpose of sale or
receipt of property described in subdivision (e)(1) or subdivision (e)(2) of
this section.
(D) A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party
neither had knowledge of nor consented to an act or omission in violation of
this subchapter;
(5) A book, record, or research product or material, including a
formula, microfilm, tape, or data that is used or intended for use in
violation of this subchapter;
(6)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(6)(B) of this
section, a thing of value, including:
(i) Firearms purchased from the proceeds of the sale
of untaxed tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products,
or e-liquid products in violation of this subchapter or used in furtherance
of a criminal offense as described in § 26-57-245;
(ii) Proceeds or profits traceable to an exchange
described in subdivision (e)(6)(A)(i) of this section; and
(iii) Money, negotiable instruments, or security used
or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of this subchapter.
(B) Property shall not be forfeited under subdivision
(e)(6)(A) of this section to the extent of the interest of an owner by reason
of an act or omission established by him or her by a preponderance of the
evidence to have been committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or
consent;
(7)(A) Money, coins, or currency found in close proximity to a
forfeitable tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product or a forfeitable record of an importation of a tobacco
product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or e-liquid product is
presumed to be forfeitable under this section.
(B) The burden of proof is upon a claimant of the money,
coins, or currency to rebut the presumption in subdivision (e)(7)(A) of this
section by a preponderance of the evidence; and
(8)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(8)(B) of this
section, real property if it substantially assisted in, facilitated in any
manner, or was used or intended for use in the commission of any act
prohibited by this subchapter.
(B)(i) Real property is not subject to forfeiture under
this section by reason of an act or omission established by the owner of the
real property by a preponderance of the evidence to have been committed or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
omitted without his or her knowledge or consent.
(ii) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a
mortgage or other lien is subject to the interest of the secured party if the
secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to an act or omission in
violation of this subchapter.
(iii) If the circuit court finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that grounds for a forfeiture exist under this section, the
court shall enter an order requiring the forfeiture of the real property.
(C) Upon an order of forfeiture of real property, the
order shall be filed on the day issued and shall have prospective effect.
(D) A forfeiture of real property does not affect the
title of a bona fide purchaser who purchased the real property before the
issuance of the order, and the order has no force or effect on the title of
the bona fide purchaser.
(E) A lis pendens filed in connection with an action
pending under this section that may result in the forfeiture of real property
is effective only from the time filed and has no retroactive effect.
(f) A tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or
e-liquid product that is possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of this subchapter may be seized and immediately forfeited to the
state.
(g)(1) Property subject to forfeiture under this subchapter may be
seized by a law enforcement agent upon process issued by a circuit court
having jurisdiction over the property on petition filed by the prosecuting
attorney of the judicial circuit.
(2) Seizure without process may be made if:
(A) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under
a search warrant or an inspection under the regulatory authority of Arkansas
Tobacco Control;
(B) The property subject to seizure has been the subject
of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or
forfeiture proceeding based upon this subchapter;
(C) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause
to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or
safety; or
(D) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation
of this subchapter.
(h)(1) A state or local law enforcement agency shall not transfer
property seized by the state or local agency under this section to a federal
entity for forfeiture under federal law unless the circuit court having
jurisdiction over the property enters an order, upon petition by the
prosecuting attorney, authorizing the property to be transferred to the
federal entity.
(2) The transfer shall not be approved unless it reasonably
appears that the activity giving rise to the investigation or seizure
involves more than one (1) state or the nature of the investigation or
seizure would be better pursued under federal law.
(i)(1) Property seized for forfeiture under this section is not
subject to replevin but is deemed to be in the custody of the seizing law
enforcement agency subject only to an order or decree of the circuit court
having jurisdiction over the property seized.
(2) Subject to a need to retain the property as evidence, when
property is seized under this subchapter, the seizing law enforcement agency
may:
(A) Remove the property to a place designated by the
circuit court;
(B) Place the property under constructive seizure, posting
notice of pending forfeiture on it by:
(i) Giving notice of pending forfeiture to its
owners and interest holders; or
(ii) Filing notice of pending forfeiture in an
appropriate public record relating to the property;
(C) Remove the property to a storage area for safekeeping
or, if the property is a negotiable instrument or money or is not needed for
evidentiary purposes, deposit it into an interest-bearing account; or
(D) Provide for another agency or custodian, including an
owner, secured party, mortgagee, or lienholder, to take custody of the
property and service, maintain, and operate it as reasonably necessary to
maintain its value in an appropriate location within the jurisdiction of the
court.
(3)(A) In case of transfer of property, a transfer receipt shall
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
be prepared by the transferring agency.
(B) The transfer receipt shall:
(i) List a detailed and complete description of the
property being transferred;
(ii) State to whom the property is being transferred
and the source or authorization for the transfer; and
(iii) Be signed by both the transferor and the
transferee.
(C) Both transferor and transferee shall maintain a copy
of the transfer receipt.
(4) A person who acts as custodian of property under this
section is not liable to any person on account of an act done in a reasonable
manner in compliance with an order under this subchapter.
(j)(1) Property seized by a state or local law enforcement officer
under this section who is detached to, deputized or commissioned by, or
working in conjunction with a federal agency remains subject to this section.
(2)(A) If property is seized for forfeiture by a law enforcement
agency under this section, the seizing law enforcement officer shall prepare
and sign a confiscation report.
(B)(i) The party from whom the property is seized shall
also sign the confiscation report if present and shall immediately receive a
copy of the confiscation report.
(ii) If the party refuses to sign the confiscation
report, the confiscation report shall be signed by one (1) additional law
enforcement officer, stating that the party refused to sign the confiscation
report.
(C) The original confiscation report shall be:
(i) Filed with the seizing law enforcement agency
within forty-eight (48) hours after the seizure; and
(ii) Maintained in a separate file.
(D) One (1) copy of the confiscation report shall be
retained by the seizing law enforcement officer.
(3) The confiscation report shall contain the following
information:
(A) A detailed description of the property seized
including serial or model numbers and odometer or hour reading of vehicles or
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
equipment;
(B) The date of seizure;
(C) The name and address of the party from whom the
property was seized;
(D) The reason for the seizure;
(E) The location where the property will be held;
(F) The seizing law enforcement officer's name; and
(G) A signed statement by the seizing law enforcement
officer stating that the confiscation report is true and complete.
(4) Within three (3) business days after receiving the
confiscation report, the seizing law enforcement agency shall forward a copy
of the confiscation report to the prosecuting attorney for the district where
the property was seized and to the director.
(5)(A) Arkansas Legislative Audit shall notify the director and
a circuit court in the county of a law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or other public entity that the law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or public entity is ineligible to receive forfeited funds,
forfeited property, or grants from the council, if Arkansas Legislative Audit
determines by its own investigation or upon written notice from the director
that:
(i) The law enforcement agency failed to complete
and file the confiscation reports as required by this section;
(ii) The law enforcement agency, prosecuting
attorney, or public entity has not properly accounted for the seized
property; or
(iii) The prosecuting attorney has failed to comply
with the notification requirement set forth in subdivision (m)(2) of this
section.
(B) After the notice, the circuit court shall not issue an
order distributing seized property to that law enforcement agency,
prosecuting attorney, or public entity, nor shall a grant be awarded by the
council to that law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public
entity until:
(i) The appropriate officials of the law enforcement
agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity have appeared before the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(ii) The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has
adopted a motion authorizing subsequent transfers of forfeited property to
the law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity.
(C)(i) If a law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney,
or other public entity is ineligible to receive forfeited property, the
circuit court shall order money that would have been distributed to that law
enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity to be transmitted
to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Special State Assets
Forfeiture Fund.
(ii) If the property is not cash, the circuit court
shall order the property converted to cash under this section and the
proceeds transmitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Special
State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(D) Moneys deposited into the Special State Assets
Forfeiture Fund are not subject to recovery or retrieval by an ineligible law
enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or other public entity.
(6) The director shall establish by rule a standardized
confiscation report form to be used by all law enforcement agencies, with
specific instructions and guidelines concerning the nature and dollar value
of all property, including firearms, to be included in the confiscation
report and forwarded to the office of the local prosecuting attorney and the
director under this subsection.
(k)(1)(A) The prosecuting attorney shall initiate forfeiture
proceedings by filing a complaint with the circuit clerk of the county where
the property was seized and by serving the complaint on all known owners and
interest holders of the seized property in accordance with the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(B) The complaint may be based on in rem or in personam
jurisdiction but shall not be filed to avoid the distribution requirements
set forth in subdivision (l)(1) of this section.
(C) The prosecuting attorney shall mail a copy of the
complaint to the director within five (5) calendar days after filing the
complaint.
(2)(A) The complaint shall include a copy of the confiscation
report and shall be filed within sixty (60) days after receiving a copy of
the confiscation report from the seizing law enforcement agency.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(B) In a case involving real property, the complaint shall
be filed within sixty (60) days of the defendant's conviction on the charge
giving rise to the forfeiture.
(3)(A) The prosecuting attorney may file the complaint after the
expiration of the time only if the complaint is accompanied by a statement of
good cause for the late filing.
(B) However, the complaint shall not be filed more than
one hundred twenty (120) days after either the date of the seizure or, in a
case involving real property, the date of the defendant's conviction.
(C)(i) If the circuit court determines that good cause has
not been established, the circuit court shall order that the seized property
be returned to the owner or interest holder.
(ii) In addition, items seized but not subject to
forfeiture under this section or subject to disposition under law or the
Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure may be ordered returned to the owner or
interest holder.
(iii) If the owner or interest holder cannot be
determined, the court may order disposition of the property.
(4) Within the time set forth in the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, the owner or interest holder of the seized property shall file
with the circuit clerk a verified answer to the complaint that shall include:
(A) A statement describing the seized property and the
owner's interest or interest holder's interest in the seized property with
supporting documents to establish the owner's interest or interest holder's
interest;
(B) A certification by the owner or interest holder
stating that he or she has read the document and that it has not been filed
for an improper purpose;
(C) A statement setting forth any defense to forfeiture;
and
(D) The address at which the owner or interest holder will
accept mail.
(5)(A) If the owner or interest holder fails to file an answer,
the prosecuting attorney may move for default judgment under the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure.
(B)(i) If a timely answer has been filed, the prosecuting
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
attorney has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that
the seized property should be forfeited.
(ii) After the prosecuting attorney has presented
proof, an owner or interest holder of the property seized is allowed to
present evidence showing why the seized property should not be forfeited.
(iii) If the circuit court determines that grounds
for forfeiting the seized property exist and that a defense to forfeiture has
not been established by the owner or interest holder, the circuit court shall
enter an order under this section. However, if the circuit court determines
either that the prosecuting attorney has failed to establish that grounds for
forfeiting the seized property exist or that the owner or interest holder has
established a defense to forfeiture, the court shall order that the seized
property be immediately returned to the owner or interest holder.
(l)(1) If the circuit court having jurisdiction over the seized
property finds upon a hearing by a preponderance of the evidence that grounds
for a forfeiture exist under this subchapter, the circuit court shall enter
an order:
(A) To permit the law enforcement agency or prosecuting
attorney to retain the seized property for law enforcement or prosecutorial
purposes, subject to the following provisions:
(i)(a) Seized property may not be retained for
official use for more than three (3) years, unless the circuit court finds
that the seized property has been used for law enforcement or prosecutorial
purposes and authorizes continued use for those purposes on an annual basis.
(b) At the end of the retention period, the
seized property shall be sold and eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall
be deposited into the tobacco control fund of the retaining law enforcement
agency or prosecuting attorney, and twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds
shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited
to the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(c) The retaining law enforcement agency or
prosecuting attorney may sell the retained seized property during the time
allowed for retention. However, the proceeds of the sale shall be distributed
as set forth in subdivision (l)(1)(A)(i)(b) of this section;
(ii) If the circuit court determines that retained
seized property has been used for personal use or by non-law enforcement
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
personnel for non-law enforcement purposes, the circuit court shall order the
seized property to be sold under § 5-5-101(e) and (f), and the proceeds shall
be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited to
the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund;
(iii)(a) A law enforcement agency may use forfeited
property or money if the circuit court's order specifies that the forfeited
property or money is forfeited to the prosecuting attorney, sheriff, chief of
police, Division of Arkansas State Police, director, or Arkansas Highway
Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation.
(b) After the order, the prosecuting attorney,
sheriff, chief of police, Division of Arkansas State Police, director, or
Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation
shall maintain an inventory of the forfeited property or money, be
accountable for the forfeited property or money, and be subject to
subdivision (j)(5) of this section with respect to the forfeited property or
money;
(iv)(a) An aircraft is forfeited to the office of
the director and may be used only for tobacco, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, or e-liquid product smuggling interdiction efforts within
the discretion of the director.
(b) However, if the director determines that
the aircraft should be sold, the proceeds of the sale shall be distributed as
set forth in subdivision (l)(1)(A)(i)(b) of this section;
(v) A firearm not retained for official use shall be
disposed of in accordance with state and federal law; and
(vi) A tobacco product, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, or e-liquid product shall be destroyed pursuant to a court
order;
(B)(i) To sell seized property that is not required by law
to be destroyed and that is not harmful to the public.
(ii) Seized property described in subdivision
(l)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be sold at a public sale by the retaining
law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney under § 5-5-101(e) and (f); or
(C) To transfer a motor vehicle to a school district for
use in a driver education course.
(2) Disposition of forfeited property under this subsection is
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
subject to the need to retain the forfeited property as evidence in any
related proceeding.
(3) Within three (3) business days after the entry of the order,
the circuit clerk shall forward to the director copies of the confiscation
report, the circuit court's order, and other documentation detailing the
disposition of the seized property.
(m)(1)(A) Subject to subdivision (j)(5) of this section, the proceeds
of sales conducted under this section and moneys forfeited or obtained by
judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited and
distributed in the manner provided in this subsection.
(B) Moneys received from a federal forfeiture for a
violation of this subchapter shall be deposited and distributed under this
section.
(2)(A) The proceeds of a sale and moneys forfeited or obtained
by judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited into the
asset forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney and is subject to the
following provisions:
(i) If, during a calendar year, the aggregate amount
of moneys deposited into the asset forfeiture fund exceeds twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) per county, the prosecuting attorney, within fourteen (14)
days after that time, shall notify the circuit judges in the judicial
district and the director;
(ii) Subsequent to the notification set forth in this
section, twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds of an additional sale and
additional moneys forfeited or obtained by judgment or settlement under this
subchapter in the same calendar year shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the Special State Assets
Forfeiture Fund, and the remainder shall be deposited into the asset
forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney;
(iii) Failure by the prosecuting attorney to comply
with the notification requirement set forth in this section renders the
prosecuting attorney and an entity eligible to receive forfeited moneys or
property from the prosecuting attorney ineligible to receive forfeited moneys
or property, except as provided in this section; and
(iv) Twenty percent (20%) of moneys in excess of
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) that have been retained but not reported as
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
required by this section are subject to recovery for deposit into the Special
State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(B) The prosecuting attorney shall administer expenditures
from the asset forfeiture fund, which is subject to audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit. Moneys distributed from the asset forfeiture fund shall be
used only for law enforcement and prosecutorial purposes. Moneys in the asset
forfeiture fund shall be distributed in the following order:
(i) For the satisfaction of a bona fide security
interest or lien;
(ii) For payment of a proper expense of the
proceeding for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure,
maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs;
(iii) Any balance under three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be distributed proportionally so as to reflect
generally the contribution of the appropriate local or state law enforcement
or prosecutorial agency's participation in any activity that led to the
seizure or forfeiture of the property or deposit of moneys under this
subchapter; and
(iv) Any balance over three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be forwarded to the director to be transferred to
the State Treasury for deposit into the Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund
for distribution under this section.
(C)(i) For a forfeiture in an amount greater than three
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) from which expenses are paid for a
proceeding for forfeiture and sale under this section, an itemized accounting
of the expenses shall be delivered to the director within ten (10) calendar
days after the distribution of the funds.
(ii) The itemized accounting shall include the
expenses paid, to whom paid, and for what purposes the expenses were paid.
(3)(A) Moneys received by a prosecuting attorney or law
enforcement agency from a federal forfeiture for a violation of this
subchapter shall be deposited and maintained in a separate account.
(B) However, a balance over three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) shall be distributed as required under this section.
(4) Other moneys shall not be maintained in the account except
for interest income generated by the account.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(5) Moneys in the account shall only be used for law enforcement
and prosecutorial purposes consistent with governing federal law.
(6) The account is subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative
Audit.
(7) A balance over three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) shall be transferred to the State Treasury for deposit into the
Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund in which it shall be maintained
separately and distributed consistently with governing federal law and upon
the advice of the director.
(n) In personam jurisdiction may be based on a person's presence in
the state or on his or her conduct in the state, as set out in § 16-4-101(C),
and is subject to the following additional provisions:
(1) A temporary restraining order under this section may be
entered ex parte on application of the state upon a showing that:
(A) There is probable cause to believe that the property
with respect to which the order is sought is subject to forfeiture under this
section; and
(B) Notice of the action would jeopardize the availability
of the property for forfeiture;
(2)(A) Notice of the entry of a temporary restraining order and
an opportunity for hearing shall be afforded to a person known to have an
interest in the property.
(B) The hearing shall be held at the earliest possible
date consistent with Rule 65 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and is
limited to the issues of whether:
(i) There is a probability that the state will
prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the temporary
restraining order will result in the property's being destroyed, conveyed,
alienated, encumbered, disposed of, received, removed from the jurisdiction
of the circuit court, concealed, or otherwise made unavailable for
forfeiture; and
(ii) The need to preserve the availability of
property through the entry of the requested temporary restraining order
outweighs the hardship on an owner or interest holder against whom the
temporary restraining order is to be entered;
(3) The state has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
evidence to show that the defendant's property is subject to forfeiture;
(4)(A) On a determination of liability of a person for conduct
giving rise to forfeiture under this section, the circuit court shall enter a
judgment of forfeiture of the property subject to forfeiture as alleged in
the complaint and may authorize the prosecuting attorney or a law enforcement
officer to seize property subject to forfeiture under this section not
previously seized or not then under seizure.
(B) The order of forfeiture shall be consistent with
subsection (l) of this section.
(C) In connection with the judgment, on application of the
state, the circuit court may enter an appropriate order to protect the
interest of the state in property ordered forfeited; and
(5) Subsequent to the finding of liability and order of
forfeiture, the following procedures apply:
(A) The attorney for the state shall give notice of
pending forfeiture in the manner provided in Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of
Civil Procedure to an owner or interest holder who has not previously been
given notice;
(B) An owner of or interest holder in property that has
been ordered forfeited and whose claim is not precluded may file a claim
within thirty (30) days after initial notice of pending forfeiture or after
notice under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, whichever is
earlier; and
(C) The circuit court may amend the in personam order of
forfeiture if the circuit court determines that a claimant has established
that he or she has an interest in the property and that the interest is
exempt under this section.
(o) The circuit court shall order the forfeiture of other property of
a claimant or defendant up to the value of the claimant's or defendant's
property found by the circuit court to be subject to forfeiture under this
section if any of the forfeitable property had remained under the control or
custody of the claimant or defendant and:
(1) Cannot be located;
(2) Was transferred or conveyed to, sold to, or deposited with a
third party;
(3) Is beyond the jurisdiction of the circuit court;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(4) Was substantially diminished in value while not in the
actual physical custody of the seizing law enforcement agency;
(5) Was commingled with other property that cannot be divided
without difficulty; or
(6) Is subject to interest exempted from forfeiture under this
subchapter.
(p)(1) There is created on the books of law enforcement agencies and
prosecuting attorneys a tobacco control fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys obtained under this section
and other revenue as may be provided by law or ordinance.
(3) Moneys in the tobacco control fund shall be appropriated on
a continuing basis and are not subject to the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 et seq.
(4)(A) The fund shall be used for law enforcement and
prosecutorial purposes.
(B) Each prosecuting attorney shall submit to the Director
of Arkansas Tobacco Control on or before June 30 of each year a report
detailing moneys received and expenditures made from the tobacco control fund
during the preceding twelve-month period.
(5) The law enforcement agencies and prosecuting attorneys shall
submit to the director on or before June 30 of each year a report detailing
any moneys received and expenditures made from the tobacco control fund
during the preceding twelve-month period.
(6) Moneys from the tobacco control fund may not supplant other
local, state, or federal funds.
(7) The tobacco control fund is subject to audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 26-57-249(b), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the procedure for
destruction of products upon conviction, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon an administrative finding of guilty of any person charged
with a violation of a state tobacco product, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, or e-liquid product, or consumable hemp product law or rule
in a proceeding before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board where the
investigation resulted in the seizure of tobacco products, vapor products,
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products, or consumable hemp
products, the board shall issue an order to destroy the tobacco products,
vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products, or
consumable hemp products confiscated by Arkansas Tobacco Control or by any
state, county, or municipal officer in this state.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 26-57-249, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
26-57-249. Destruction of products upon conviction — Procedure.
(a) Upon a criminal conviction of a person charged with a violation of
a tobacco product, vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or e-liquid
product law or rule where the investigation resulted in the seizure of
tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products, the court shall issue an order to destroy the tobacco products,
vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products
confiscated by Arkansas Tobacco Control or by any state, county, or municipal
officer in this state.
(b) Upon an administrative finding of guilty of any person charged
with a violation of a state tobacco product, vapor product, alternative
nicotine product, e-liquid product, or hemp-derived product law or rule in a
proceeding before the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board where the investigation
resulted in the seizure of tobacco products, vapor products, alternative
nicotine products, e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products, the board
shall issue an order to destroy the tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products
confiscated by Arkansas Tobacco Control or by any state, county, or municipal
officer in this state.
(c) Every court of record in this state shall notify the Director of
Arkansas Tobacco Control of the disposition made of each case in the court as
to whether the defendant was convicted or acquitted.
(d) Upon application of the director, the board or the court issuing a
destruction order may instead release the tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products to the use and benefit of
Arkansas Tobacco Control for suitable law enforcement or training purposes.
(e)(1) If a court or the board issues a destruction order, the person
charged with the violation is responsible for any destruction fees incurred
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(2) Destruction fees may vary but shall be determined by the
current industry standard for the destruction of tobacco products, vapor
products, alternative nicotine products, and e-liquid products.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 26-57-255(g)(3), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Conduct public hearings when appropriate regarding a
permit authorized under this subchapter or in violation of this subchapter,
the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., § 5-27-227, § 20-56-501
et seq., or any other federal, state, or local statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation concerning the sale of tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid products, or consumable hemp
products to minors, or the rules promulgated by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(B) After notice and hearing held in accordance with the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if the board
finds a violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-
701 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control, the board may suspend or revoke any or all permits issued by
the director to any person.
(C) The board may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation against a person
found to be in violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act,
§ 4-75-701 et seq., § 20-56-501 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control.
(D) Each day of a violation is a separate violation.
(E) A civil penalty under subdivision (g)(3)(C) of this
section is in addition to any penalties levied by the board under § 26-57-
248.
(F) In conducting a hearing under this subdivision (g)(3),
the board may examine or cause to be examined under oath any witness and the
books and records of a permitted person or other person;

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 26-57-255, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
26-57-255. Arkansas Tobacco Control Board — Creation — Definition.
(a) There is created the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board to consist of
the following eight (8) members appointed by the Governor:
(1) Two (2) members of the board shall be wholesalers of tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products;
(2) Two (2) members of the board shall be retailers of tobacco
products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, or e-liquid
products; and
(3) Four (4) members of the board shall be members of the public
at large who are not public employees or officials, at least one (1) of whom
shall be an African-American, and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor after consulting the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc. and subject to
confirmation by the Senate.
(b) The Governor shall designate which member of the board shall act
as chair and that person shall serve as chair for two (2) years unless his or
her membership on the board ceases prior to the end of the two-year period.
(c)(1) All members of the board shall be residents of the State of
Arkansas and confirmed by the Senate.
(2) The term of office shall be five (5) years.
(d)(1) A minimum of five (5) members is required for a quorum.
(2)(A) All action by the board shall be by a majority vote of
the board members present at the regular or special meeting, and the board
may take no official action in connection with a matter except at a regular
or special meeting.
(B) In the event of a tie vote of the members of the
board, the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control may cast the deciding vote.
(e) A person who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not
resided in the State of Arkansas for at least two (2) consecutive years
immediately preceding the date of appointment shall not be appointed to the
board.
(f) Each member of the board and the director shall take and subscribe
to an oath that he or she will support and enforce this subchapter, the
tobacco control laws of this state, the Arkansas Constitution, and the United
States Constitution.
(g) The board shall:
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(1) Act as the adjudicatory body for Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(2) Have responsibility for approving the issuance, suspension,
and revocation of the permits enumerated in § 26-57-219;
(3)(A) Conduct public hearings when appropriate regarding a
permit authorized under this subchapter or in violation of this subchapter,
the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq., § 5-27-227, § 20-56-401
et seq., or any other federal, state, or local statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation concerning the sale of tobacco products, vapor products,
alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products, or hemp-derived products to
minors or the rules promulgated by Arkansas Tobacco Control.
(B) After notice and hearing held in accordance with the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if the board
finds a violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-
701 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control, the board may suspend or revoke any or all permits issued by
the director to any person.
(C) The board may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation against a person
found to be in violation of this subchapter, the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act,
§ 4-75-701 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq., or the rules promulgated by Arkansas
Tobacco Control.
(D) Each day of a violation is a separate violation.
(E) A civil penalty under subdivision (g)(3)(C) of this
section is in addition to any penalties levied by the board under § 26-57-
248.
(F) In conducting a hearing under this subdivision (g)(3),
the board may examine or cause to be examined under oath any witness and the
books and records of a permitted person or other person;
(4) When requested by the written petition of at least three (3)
interested parties, conduct public hearings to receive testimony regarding
the facts relevant to the issuance of a permit under this subchapter; and
(5)(A) Not have authority in criminal prosecutions or the
assessment or collection of any taxes.
(B) However, the board shall refuse to approve the
issuance or renewal of a permit issued by the director for the failure to pay
taxes or fees imposed on tobacco products or any permit fees imposed under
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
this subchapter or any other state or local taxes.
(h)(1) The board may assess penalties for a violation of § 5-27-227
according to the following schedule:
(A) For a first violation within a forty-eight-month
period, a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(B) For a second violation within a forty-eight-month
period, a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) and
suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period not to exceed
two (2) days;
(C) For a third violation within a forty-eight-month
period, a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and
suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period not to exceed
seven (7) days;
(D) For a fourth or subsequent violation within a forty-
eight-month period, a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000) and suspension of the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 for a period
not to exceed fourteen (14) days; and
(E) For a fifth or subsequent violation within a forty-
eight-month period, in addition to the other penalties provided under this
subsection, the permit enumerated in § 26-57-219 may be revoked.
(2)(A) A penalty under this subsection shall not be imposed on a
retailer or an agent or employee of a retailer who can establish an
affirmative defense that before the date of the violation the retailer or
agent or employee of the retailer furnishing the tobacco products, vapor
products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid products, or cigarette
papers reasonably relied on proof of age that identified the person receiving
the tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, e-liquid
products, or cigarette papers as not being a minor.
(B) As used in this subsection, “proof of age” means valid
documentation issued by a governmental agency containing the person's
photograph, date of birth, and an expiration date.
(3)(A) For a corporation or business with more than one (1)
retail location, to determine the number of accumulated violations for
purposes of the penalty schedule stated in this subsection, violations of §
5-27-227 by one (1) retail location shall not be accumulated against other
retail locations of that same corporation or business.
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(B) For a retail location, for purposes of the penalty
schedule stated in this subsection, violations accumulated and assessed
against a prior owner of the retail location shall not be accumulated against
a new owner of the same retail location unless approved by the board.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 26-57-256(a)(2) and (3), effective until
the contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the powers of
Arkansas Tobacco Control, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Receive applications for and issue, refuse, suspend, and
revoke permits listed in § 26-57-219 and § 20-56-501 et seq.
(B) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall refuse to issue or
renew any permits issued by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for the
failure to pay:
(i) Any applicable taxes or fees imposed on tobacco
products,;
(ii) Permit permit fees imposed under this
subchapter and § 20-56-501 et seq.;, or
(iii) Any any other state or local taxes;
(3) Prescribe forms of applications for permits under this
subchapter and § 20-56-501 et seq.;

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 26-57-256(b), effective until the
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, concerning the powers of
Arkansas Tobacco Control, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Any tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, e-liquid products, consumable hemp products, or cigarette papers
found in the possession of a minor may be confiscated and destroyed.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 26-57-256, effective if the contingency in
Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met, is repealed.
26-57-256. Arkansas Tobacco Control — Powers.
(a) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall:
(1) Promulgate rules for the proper enforcement and
implementation of this subchapter and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-
701 et seq.;
(2)(A) Receive applications for and issue, refuse, suspend, and
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
revoke permits listed in § 26-57-219 and § 20-56-401 et seq.
(B) Arkansas Tobacco Control shall refuse to issue or
renew any permits issued by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control for the
failure to pay:
(i) Any applicable taxes or fees imposed on tobacco
products;
(ii) Permit fees imposed under this subchapter or on
hemp-derived products under § 20-56-401 et seq.; or
(iii) Other state or local taxes;
(3) Prescribe forms of applications for permits under this
subchapter and § 20-56-401 et seq.;
(4)(A) Cooperate with the Revenue Division of the Department of
Finance and Administration in the enforcement of the tax laws affecting the
sale of tobacco products in this state and in the enforcement of all other
state and local tax laws.
(B) To facilitate efforts to cooperate with the division
concerning the enforcement of all other state and local tax laws, Arkansas
Tobacco Control shall immediately require that the following additional
information be provided by all applicants for permit issuance or renewal:
(i) Federal tax identification numbers issued by the
Internal Revenue Service;
(ii) Social Security numbers; and
(iii) State sales tax account numbers assigned by
the Department of Finance and Administration, if applicable.
(C)(i) Each year Arkansas Tobacco Control shall provide a
list of all applicants for the issuance or renewal of all tobacco products,
vapor product, alternative nicotine product, or e-liquid product permits to
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(ii) This list shall contain the identifying
information required by subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section as well as the
name of the permittee and the permittee's current business address;
(5)(A) Collect civil penalties assessed by the Arkansas Tobacco
Control Board under § 26-57-255.
(B) Unless the civil penalty is paid within fifteen (15)
days following the date for an appeal from the order, the director shall have
the power to institute a civil action in the Pulaski County Circuit Court to
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
recover the civil penalties assessed; and
(6)(A) Provide notice to the retail location of an alleged
violation of § 5-27-227 within ten (10) days of the alleged violation.
(B) The notice required under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of
this section shall contain the date and time of the alleged violation.
(b) Any tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine
products, e-liquid products, hemp-derived products as defined in § 20-56-402,
or cigarette papers found in the possession of a minor may be confiscated and
destroyed.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the penalties collected under
this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

SECTION 21. Uncodified Section 17 of Acts 2023, No. 629, which
reflects changes to the references to "Sections 6-14", and "Sections 2-5" in
Acts 2023, No. 629, §§ 16 and 17 made by the Arkansas Code Revision
Commission, is repealed.
SECTION 17. Contingent effective date.
Sections 6-14 [8-16] of this act shall become effective only upon the
certification of the Arkansas Attorney General that the State of Arkansas is
currently enjoined from enforcing Sections 2-5 [2-7] of this act relating to
delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol and delta-10 tetrahyrdocannabinol, but no
earlier than August 1, 2023.

SECTION 22. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

SECTION 23. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.
(a) This act shall be effective on and after the certification of the
Attorney General that:
(1) A final judgement in the case of Bio Gen LLC, et al v.
Sanders, et al, 4:23-cv-00718-BRW, and any subsequent appeals upholds the
legality of Acts 2023, No.629;
04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 H4/8/25 SB533
(2) The United States Congress explicitly delegates the
authority to the states to more stringently regulate or ban hemp-derived
products;
(3) The United States Congress amends the Agricultural Marketing
Act of 1946 to exclude from the definition of hemp any intoxicating
cannabinoids or otherwise disallows intoxicating hemp-derived products; or
(4) The United States Congress amends the Agriculture
Improvement Act of 2018 or passes a new Agriculture Improvement Act that
excludes from the definition of hemp any intoxicating cannabinoids or
otherwise disallows intoxicating hemp-derived substances.
(b) The Attorney General shall notify the Director of the Bureau of
Legislative Research and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission if he or she
makes a certification under subsection (a) of this section.

/s/Dees





















04-08-2025 10:08:29 JMB498